Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1755
Central credit union; purchase of credit union.

With the approval of the department, a central credit union established under section 21-1752 may purchase the assets, assume the liabilities, and accept the membership of a credit union. Such purchase shall be approved by at least a two-thirds majority of the board of directors or the duly appointed trustees of the credit union to be sold.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 55;

Laws 2002, LB 1094, § 11.